Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-204
Library board; organization; officers; quorum.

The members of any city, village, county, or township library board shall immediately after their appointment meet and organize by electing from their number a president, secretary, and such other officers as may be necessary. A majority of the members of a city, village, county, or township library board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Laws 1911, c. 73, § 4, p. 315;

R.S.1913, § 3795;

C.S.1922, § 3188;

Laws 1923, c. 148, § 1, p. 363;

Laws 1925, c. 38, § 1, p. 148;

C.S.1929, § 51-204;

Laws 1941, c. 103, § 1, p. 421;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 51-204;

R.S.1943, § 51-204;

Laws 1997, LB 250, § 18.